Nevada, session 83, AB560.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of Child and Family Services of the
Department of Health and Human Services the sum of $444,325 for
an unanticipated shortfall in personnel, travel, transportation and
utilities expenses in the Rural Child Welfare budget account. This
appropriation is supplemental to that made by section 17 of chapter
209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1240.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)